Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8504
Act; how construed.

The Nebraska Telehealth Act does not: (1) Alter the scope of practice of any health care practitioner; (2) authorize the delivery of health care services in a setting or manner not otherwise authorized by law; or (3) limit a patient's right to choose in-person contact with a health care practitioner for the delivery of health care services for which telehealth is available.

Laws 1999, LB 559, § 4.